Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241.04
Personal watercraft; manner of operation.

(1) A person shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state in a reasonable and prudent manner. A maneuver which unreasonably or unnecessarily endangers life, limb, or property is prohibited and includes weaving through congested vessel traffic, jumping the wake produced by another vessel at a distance of less than fifty yards, or jumping the wake produced by a motorboat or personal watercraft that is towing a person or persons.

(2) A person shall not operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state unless he or she is facing forward on the watercraft.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 105;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 21.